New Jersey, session 222, S4015.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  Notwithstanding the provisions of any other law to the contrary, the Commissioner of Human Services shall permit family child care providers, registered pursuant to P.L.1987, c.27 (C.30:5B-16 et seq.), that participate in the States subsidized child care assistance program and in the Grow NJ Kids initiative, to receive enhanced reimbursements under the tiered, quality-based reimbursement system for child care providers, as established pursuant to the Grow NJ Kids program. b.    The Commissioner of Human Services shall increase State subsidies paid to family child care providers that participate in the Grow NJ Kids program, based upon the quality rating of the family child care provider, by the same percentage as the subsidy rate increase paid to center-based child care providers with the same Grow NJ Kids quality rating. c.     As used in this section Grow NJ Kids means New Jerseys quality rating and improvement system for child care and early learning programs, which rates the quality of child care services on measurable quality metrics, and provides enhanced reimbursements to participating child care programs that have been rated as providing a higher level of program quality. d.    The commissioner shall apply for such State plan amendments or waivers as may be necessary to implement the reimbursement system established pursuant to this section and to continue to secure federal financial participation for subsidized child care programs for qualified low-to-moderate income households. 2.    The Commissioner of Human Services, pursuant to the Administrative Procedure Act, P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) shall adopt such rules and regulations as necessary to implement the provisions of this act. 3.    This act shall take effect on the first day of the second month next following the date of enactment, but the Commissioner of Human Services may take such anticipatory administrative action in advance thereof as shall be necessary for the implementation of this act.